Utah statutes.
58-79-304.   Exemptions from licensure.

The exemptions from licensure under this chapter are limited to:

(1)  those set forth in Section 58-1-307; and

(2)  an employee or subordinate of a hunting guide or outfitter if:

(a)  the employee or subordinate does not use the title of hunting guide or outfitter or is not directly represented to the public to be legally qualified to engage in the practice of being a hunting guide or outfitter before the public in this state; and

(b)  the employee's or subordinate's duties do not include responsible charge.

